Washington statutes.
RCW 29A.56.350

Compensation.

Every presidential elector who attends at the time and place appointed, and gives his or her vote for president and vice president consistent with his or her pledge under RCW 29A.56.084 or 29A.56.088(3), is entitled to receive from this state a subsistence allowance and travel expenses pursuant to RCW 43.03.050 and 43.03.060 for each day's attendance at the meeting of the college of electors.

[ 2019 c 143 s 12; 2013 c 38 s 1; 2003 c 111 s 1428; 1965 c 9 s 29.71.050. Prior: 1891 c 148 s 4; RRS s 5141. Formerly RCW 29.71.050.]

NOTES:

Short title—Uniformity of application and construction—2019 c 143: See notes following RCW 29A.56.080.